Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.520

Regents and trustees—Oaths.

Each member of a board of regents or board of trustees of a university or other state institution of higher education, before entering upon his or her duties, shall take and subscribe an oath to discharge faithfully and honestly his or her duties and to perform strictly and impartially the same to the best of his or her ability, such oath to be filed with the secretary of state.

[ 2011 c 336 s 711; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 22; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.520. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 248 s 13; RRS s 4593; prior: 1897 c 118 s 202; 1891 c 145 s 14. Formerly RCW 28.80.140.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.